english.foma
    ### english.foma ###
     
    # Vowels
    define V [ a | e | i | o | u ];
     
    read lexc english.lexc
    define Lexicon;
     
    # Consonant doubling: 1-letter consonant doubled before -ing/-ed (beg/begging)
    define ConsonantDoubling g -> g g || _ "^" [i n g | e d ];
     
    # E deletion: silent e dropped before -ing and -ed (make/making)
    define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ;
     
    # E insertion e added after -s, -z, -x, -ch, -sh before s (watch/watches)
    define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;
     
    # Y replacement: -y changes to -ie before -s, -i before -ed (try/tries) 
    define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s    ,, 
                        y -> i   || _ "^" e d  ;
     
    # K insertion: verbs ending with vowel + -c add -k (panic/panicked)
    define KInsertion [..] -> k || V c _ "^" [e d | i n g];
     
    # Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
    define Cleanup "^" -> 0;
     
    read lexc english.lexc
    define Lexicon
     
    define Grammar Lexicon           .o. 
                   ConsonantDoubling .o. 
                   EDeletion         .o. 
                   EInsertion        .o. 
                   YReplacement      .o. 
                   KInsertion        .o. 
                   Cleanup;
     
    regex Grammar;
